Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,181
Application for hearing; when effective.

A written application for a hearing pursuant to section 77-27,180 shall be effective upon mailing the application, postage prepaid and properly addressed, to the appropriate agency.

Laws 1985, LB 273, § 8.